Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1602
Life insurance; policy issued to an employer; requirements.

A policy issued to an employer or to the trustees of a fund established by an employer, which employer or trustees shall be deemed the policyholder, to insure employees of the employer for the benefit of persons other than the employer shall be subject to the following requirements:

(1) The employees eligible for insurance under the policy shall be all of the employees of the employer or all of any class or classes thereof. The policy may provide that the term employees shall include the employees of one or more subsidiary corporations and the employees, individual proprietors, partners, and members of one or more affiliated corporations, proprietors, partnerships, or limited liability companies if the business of the employer and of such affiliated corporations, proprietors, partnerships, or limited liability companies is under common control. The policy may provide that the term employees shall include the individual proprietor, partners, or members if the employer is an individual proprietor, partnership, or limited liability company. The policy may provide that the term employee may include retired employees, former employees, and directors of a corporate employer; and

(2) The premium for the policy shall be paid either from the employer's funds or from funds contributed by the insured employees or from both such funds. A policy on which no part of the premium is to be derived from funds contributed by the insured employees must insure all eligible employees, except those who reject the coverage in writing, or all except any as to whom evidence of individual insurability is not satisfactory to the insurer.

Laws 1949, c. 150, § 1(1), p. 377;

Laws 1957, c. 192, § 1, p. 670;

Laws 1959, c. 212, § 1, p. 733;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 233;

Laws 2006, LB 875, § 2;

Laws 2008, LB855, § 9.